Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-32] Effect of this chapter on other
laws. All laws inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, or of any
rule issued under the authority of this chapter, shall be suspended during the
period of time and to the extent that the emergency or disaster exists, and may
be, by the governor for all laws, or mayor for county laws, designated as so
suspended. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next